District of Columbia statutes.
47-319.04

Reports.

The Committee shall submit to the Council reports on the status of the Fiscal Year 1996 budget initiatives each month or as requested by the Council.

History

Mar. 5, 1996, D.C. Law 11-98, § 704, 43 DCR 5
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-319.4.